Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,101.02
Applicant; design and planning requirements.

No license for the operation of a facility shall be granted to any applicant who proposes a disposal design which uses traditional shallow land burial as used prior to 1979. The disposal cells of the facility shall be built above grade levels and designed to meet the state's zero-release objectives. An applicant shall present a disposal design for aboveground disposal or other technology which contains one or more engineered, artificially constructed barriers to isolate the waste from the surrounding environment. An applicant shall present a plan of continuous environmental monitoring to detect any releases of radiation from the disposal facility and having the capability of providing early warning of releases of radiation from the facility. The monitoring plan shall cover the operational life of the facility and such time period following site closure and stabilization that is necessary to protect the health and safety of the public. An applicant shall present a plan for the recovery, cleanup, or other corrective action necessary as a result of the release of radiation from the facility. The facility design shall include a plan for retrievability and removal of all waste.

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 16;

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 10.